Utah statutes.
63G-6-704 (Superseded 05/01/13).   Determination of compensation for architect-engineer services.

The procurement officer shall award a contract to a qualified firm at compensation which the procurement officer determines in writing to be fair and reasonable to the state.  In making this decision, the procurement officer shall take into account the estimated value, the scope, and complexity, and the professional nature of the services to be rendered.  Should the procurement officer be unable to agree to a satisfactory contract with the firm first selected, at a price the procurement officer determines to be fair and reasonable to the state, discussions with that firm shall be formally terminated.  The procurement officer shall then undertake discussions with a second qualified firm.  Failing accord with the second firm, the procurement officer shall formally terminate discussions.  The procurement officer shall then undertake discussions with a third qualified firm.  Should the procurement officer be unable to award a contract at a fair and reasonable price with any of the selected firms, the procurement officer shall select additional firms, and the procurement officer shall continue discussions in accordance with this part until an agreement is reached.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

